Hawaii statutes.
§708-826 Criminal tampering in the first
degree. (1) A person commits the offense of criminal tampering in the
first degree if, and with intent to cause a substantial interruption or
impairment of a service rendered to the public by a utility or by an institution
providing health or safety protection, the person damages or tampers with,
without the consent of the utility or institution, its property or facilities
and thereby causes substantial interruption or impairment of service.

(2) Criminal tampering in the first degree is
a misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next